Hawaii statutes.
§431:20-114 Reinsurance reserve. (a)
A domestic title insurer shall establish and maintain a reinsurance reserve
computed in accordance with this section, and all sums attributed to the
reserve shall at all times and for all purposes be considered and constitute
unearned portions of the original premiums. This reserve shall be reported as
a liability of the title insurer in its financial statements.

(b) The reinsurance reserve shall be
maintained by the title insurer for the protection of holders of title
insurance policies. Except as provided in this section, assets equal in value
to the reinsurance reserve are not subject to distribution among creditors or
stockholders of the title insurer until all claims of policyholders or claims
under reinsurance contracts have been paid in full, and all liability on the
policies or reinsurance contracts has been paid in full and discharged or
lawfully reinsured.

(c) A foreign or alien title insurance company
licensed to transact title insurance business in this State shall maintain at
least the same reserves on title insurance policies issued on properties
located in this State as are required of domestic title insurance companies,
unless the laws of jurisdiction of domicile of the foreign or alien title insurance
company require a higher amount.

(d) The reinsurance reserve shall consist of:

(1) The amount of this surplus fund on July 1, 1988;
and

(2) A sum equal to twenty cents for each $1,000 of
net retained liability under each title insurance policy on a single risk
written on properties located in this State written after July 1, 1988.

(e) Amounts placed in the reinsurance reserve
in any year in accordance with subsection (d)(2) shall be deducted in
determining the net profit of the title insurer for that year.

(f) A title insurer shall release from the
reinsurance reserve a sum equal to ten per cent of the amount added to the
reserve during a calendar year on July 1 of each of the five years following
the year in which the sum was added, and shall release from the reinsurance
reserve a sum equal to three and one-third per cent of the amount added to the
reserve during that year on each succeeding July 1 until the entire amount for
that year has been released. The amount of the reinsurance reserve or similar
unearned premium reserve maintained before July 1, 1988, shall be released in
accordance with the law in effect before July 1, 1988. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2
as superseded by c 348, §23]

Revision Note

"July 1, 1988" substituted for "the effective
date of this code" or "Act".

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next